Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6840YC (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 507E.8, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. For purposes of an arrest resulting from a criminal 3 violation of any provision of the Code subject to the 4 jurisdiction of the commissioner established as a result of an 5 investigation pursuant to this chapter or chapter 502 , 502A , 6 507A , 522C, 522F, 523A , 523C , 523D , or 523I . 7 b. While conducting an investigation or engaged in an 8 assignment authorized by this chapter or chapter 502 , 502A , 9 507A , 522C, 522F, 523A , 523C , 523D , or 523I . 10 Sec. 2. Section 522C.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. An insurance producer licensed under 13 chapter 522B appointed by, and granted claim authority by, an 14 insurer or self-insurer. 15 Sec. 3. Section 522C.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 522C.7 Financial responsibility. 18 1. Prior to issuance of a license under section 522C.5A , 19 522C.5B , 522C.5C , or 522C.5D , an applicant shall secure 20 evidence of financial responsibility through a surety bond 21 as in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. 22 The surety bond shall be executed and issued by an insurer 23 authorized to issue surety bonds in this state and meet the 24 following requirements: 25 a. The surety bond shall be a minimum of fifty thousand 26 dollars. 27 b. The surety bond shall be in favor of the state and 28 specifically authorize recovery by the commissioner on behalf 29 of any person in this state who sustains damages as the result 30 of an adjusterâs erroneous act, failure to act, fraud, or 31 unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter 507B . 32 c. The surety bond shall not be terminated without prior 33 written notice filed with the division a minimum of thirty 34 calendar days prior to termination. 35 -1- LSB 6840YC (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ 2. The division may request that an adjuster provide 1 evidence of financial responsibility at any time the division 2 deems relevant. 3 3. An adjuster shall immediately notify the division if the 4 adjusterâs evidence of financial responsibility terminates in 5 violation of subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , or becomes impaired, 6 and the adjusterâs license shall become inactive until the 7 adjuster provides the division with evidence of financial 8 responsibility. 9 Sec. 4. EMERGENCY RULES. The insurance division may adopt 10 emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 11 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to implement the provisions 12 of this Act amending section 522C.7, and the rules shall be 13 effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is 14 specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with 15 this section shall also be published as a notice of intended 16 action as provided in section 17A.4. 17 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 18 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19